Mississippi, session 2026, HB1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  For purposes of this section: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Corrections. (b) "Jurisdiction of the department" does not include persons on probation, parole or intensive supervision under the supervision of the department. (c) "Unexpected fatality review" means a review of any death that was not the result of a diagnosed or documented terminal illness or other debilitating or deteriorating illness or condition where the death was anticipated, and includes the death of any person under the jurisdiction of the department, regardless of where the death actually occurred.  A review must include an analysis of the root cause or causes of the unexpected fatality, and an associated corrective action plan for the department to address identified root causes and recommendations made by the unexpected fatality review team under this section. (2) (a)  The department shall conduct an unexpected fatality review in any case in which the death of an incarcerated individual is unexpected. (b) The department shall convene an unexpected fatality review team and determine the membership of the review team.  The team shall comprise of individuals with appropriate expertise including, but not limited to, individuals whose professional expertise is pertinent to the dynamics of a case.  The unexpected fatality review team shall include the chairman of the House Public Health and Services Committee, the Chairman of the Public Health and Welfare Committee, the Chairpersons of the House and Senate Corrections Committees and a representative from the Mississippi Department of Health.  The department shall ensure that the unexpected fatality review team is made up of individuals who had no previous involvement in the case. (c) The primary purpose of the unexpected fatality review shall be the development of recommendations to the department and legislature regarding changes in practices or policies to prevent fatalities and strengthen safety and health protections for prisoners in the custody of the department. (d) Upon conclusion of an unexpected fatality review required pursuant to this section, the department shall, within 120 days following the fatality, issue a report on the results of the review, unless an extension has been granted by the Governor.  Reports must be distributed to the House and Senate Corrections Chairpersons of the Legislature, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Lieutenant Governor and Governor, and the department shall create a public website where all unexpected fatality review reports required under this section must be posted and maintained.  An unexpected fatality review report completed pursuant to this section is subject to public disclosure and must be posted on the public website, except that confidential information may be redacted by the department consistent with the requirements of applicable state and federal laws. (e) Within ten (10) days of completion of an unexpected fatality review under this section, the department shall develop an associated corrective action plan to implement any recommendations made by the review team in the unexpected fatality review report.  Corrective action plans shall be implemented within 120 days, unless an extension has been granted by the governor.  Corrective action plans are subject to public disclosure, and must be posted on the department's website in accordance with (d) of this subsection, except that confidential information may be redacted by the department consistent with the requirements of applicable state and federal laws. (f) The department shall develop and implement procedures to carry out the requirements of this section. (3)  In any review of an unexpected fatality, the department and the unexpected fatality review team shall have access to all records and files regarding the person or otherwise relevant to the review that have been produced or retained by an agency who has provided  care, supervision or services to the deceased inmate. (4)  (a) An unexpected fatality review completed pursuant to this section is subject to discovery in a civil or administrative proceeding, but may not be admitted into evidence or otherwise used in a civil or administrative proceeding except pursuant to this section. (b)  A department employee responsible for conducting an unexpected fatality review, or member of an unexpected fatality review team, may not be examined in a civil or administrative proceeding regarding:  (i) The work of the unexpected fatality review team; (ii) the incident under review; (iii) his or her statements, deliberations, thoughts, analyses, or impressions relating to the work of the unexpected fatality review team or the incident under review; or (iv) the statements, deliberations, thoughts, analyses, or impressions of any other member of the unexpected fatality review team, or any person who provided information to the unexpected fatality review team relating to the work of the unexpected fatality review team or the incident under review. (c) Documents prepared by or for an unexpected fatality review team are inadmissible and may not be used in a civil or administrative proceeding, except that any document that exists before its use or consideration in an unexpected fatality review, or that is created independently of such review, does not become inadmissible merely because it is reviewed or used by an unexpected fatality review team.  A person is not unavailable as a witness merely because the person has been interviewed by, or has provided a statement for, an unexpected fatality review, but if the person is called as a witness, the person may not be examined regarding the person's interactions with the unexpected fatality review including, without limitation, whether the person was interviewed during such review, the questions that were asked during such review, and the answers that the person provided during such review.  This section may not be construed as restricting the person from testifying fully in any proceeding regarding his or her knowledge of the incident under review. (d) The restrictions set forth in this section do not apply in a licensing or disciplinary proceeding arising from an agency's effort to revoke or suspend the license of any licensed professional based in whole or in part upon allegations of wrongdoing in connection with an unexpected fatality reviewed by an unexpected fatality review team. SECTION 2.  Section 25-61-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-61-5.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided by Sections 25-61-9, 25-61-11, 25-61-11.2, * * *and 37-153-7 and Section 1 of this act, all public records are hereby declared to be public property, and any person shall have the right to inspect, copy or mechanically reproduce or obtain a reproduction of any public record of a public body in accordance with reasonable written procedures adopted by the public body concerning the cost, time, place and method of access, and public notice of the procedures shall be given by the public body, or, if a public body has not adopted written procedures, the right to inspect, copy or mechanically reproduce or obtain a reproduction of a public record of the public body shall be provided within one (1) working day after a written request for a public record is made.  No public body shall adopt procedures which will authorize the public body to produce or deny production of a public record later than seven (7) working days from the date of the receipt of the request for the production of the record. (b)  If a public body is unable to produce a public record by the seventh working day after the request is made, the public body must provide a written explanation to the person making the request stating that the record requested will be produced and specifying with particularity why the records cannot be produced within the seven-day period.  Unless there is mutual agreement of the parties, in no event shall the date for the public body's production of the requested records be any later than fourteen (14) working days from the receipt by the public body of the original request. (2)  If any public record contains material which is not exempted under this chapter, the public agency shall redact the exempted material and make the nonexempted material available for examination.  Such public agency shall be entitled to charge a reasonable fee for the redaction of any exempted material, not to exceed the agency's actual cost. (3)  Denial by a public body of a request for access to or copies of public records under this chapter shall be in writing and shall contain a statement of the specific exemption relied upon by the public body for the denial.  Each public body shall maintain a file of all denials of requests for public records.  Public bodies shall be required to preserve such denials on file for not less than three (3) years from the date such denials are made.  This file shall be made available for inspection or copying, or both, during regular office hours to any person upon written request. (4)  Where any public body is preparing or conducting a competitive procurement, the time limitations contained in this section shall be tolled until the public body determines it will not issue the procurement, cancels the procurement or issues a notice naming its intended awardee. (5)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 3.  Section 25-61-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-61-12.  (1)  The home address, any telephone number of a privately paid account or other private information of any law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, or the spouse or child of the law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  This exemption does not apply to any court transcript or recording if given under oath and not otherwise excluded by law. (2)  (a)  When in the possession of a law enforcement agency, investigative reports shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; however, a law enforcement agency, in its discretion, may choose to make public all or any part of any investigative report. (b)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any and all public bodies from having among themselves a free flow of information for the purpose of achieving a coordinated and effective detection and investigation of unlawful activity. Where the confidentiality of records covered by this section is being determined in a private hearing before a judge under Section 25-61-13, the public body may redact or separate from the records the identity of confidential informants or the identity of the person or persons under investigation or other information other than the nature of the incident, time, date and location. (c)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt from public disclosure a law enforcement incident report.  An incident report shall be a public record.  A law enforcement agency may release information in addition to the information contained in the incident report. (d)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the disclosure of information that would reveal the identity of the victim. (3)  Personal information of victims, including victim impact statements and letters of support on behalf of victims that are contained in records on file with the Mississippi Department of Corrections and State Parole Board, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (4)  Records of a public hospital board relating to the purchase or sale of medical or other practices or other business operations, and the recruitment of physicians and other health care professionals, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.